zh-TW: 負載容量: 重工作; 輕工作; 中工作; 其他
ro-RO: Capacitate de încărcare: Regim greu; Regim ușor; Regim rediu; Altele
cs: Nosnost: Náročné podmínky; Nenáročné podmínky; Středně náročné podmínky; Jiné
sk-SK: Nosnosť: Ťažký; Ľahký; Stredný; Iné
th: กำลังรับน้ำหนัก: การใช้งานหนัก; การใช้งานเบา; การใช้งานปานกลาง; อื่นๆ
el: Φέρουσα ικανότητα: Μεγάλης αντοχής; Ελαφράς αντοχής; Μεσαίας αντοχής; Άλλο
bg-BG: Товароносимост: Тежкотоварен; Лекотоварен; Средно натоварване; Други
sv: Lastkapacitet: Kraftig; Lättvikt; Medeltung; Övrigt
pt-PT: Capacidade de carga: Serviços pesados; Serviços leves; Peso médio; Outro
hr-HR: Nosivost: Za teške poslove; Za lake poslove; Za srednje teške poslove; Ostalo
ko: 부하 용량: 헤비 듀티; 라이트 듀티; 미디엄 듀티; 기타
zh-CN: 承载能力: 重型; 轻型; 中型; 其他
da: Belastningskapacitet: Kraftig ydelse; Let ydelse; Medium ydelse; Andet
lt-LT: Apkrova: Didelės apkrovos; Lengvos apkrovos; Vidutinės apkrovos; Kita
tr: Yükleme Kapasitesi: Ağır hizmet; Hafif hizmet; Orta hizmet; Diğer
sl-SI: Nosilnost: Močna; Lahka; Srednja; Drugo
nl: Laadcapaciteit: Zwaar werk; Lichte taak; Middelzwaar; Andere
nb: Lastkapasitet: Tungt arbeid; Lett arbeid; Middels arbeid; Annet
ru: Грузоподъемность: Тяжелый; Легкий; Средний; Другой
de: Tragfähigkeit: Schwerlast; Leichtlast; Mittellast; Sonstiges
vi: Dung lượng tải: Hạng nặng; Hạng nhẹ; Hạng vừa; Khác
ja: 荷重容量: ヘビーデューティ; ライトデューティ; ミディアムデューティ; その他
hu: Teherbírás: Nagy teherbírású; Kis teherbírású; Közepes teherbírású; Egyéb
pt-BR: Capacidade de carregamento: Resistente; Leve; Médio; Outro
it: Capacità di carico: Molto pesante; Molto leggero; Medio-leggero; Altro
es: Capacidad de carga: Intensidad alta; Intensidad baja; Intensidad media; Otros
fr: Capacité de chargement: À toute épreuve; Travaux légers; Travaux moyens; Autre
en: Load capacity: Heavy-duty; Light-duty; Medium-duty; Other
pl: Ładowność: Wytrzymały; Lekkie; Średnio wytrzymały; Inne
fi: Kuormituskapasiteetti: Heavy-duty; Light-duty; Medium-duty; Muu